Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,310
Nebraska Sesquicentennial Commission;
duties; powers.

The
Nebraska Sesquicentennial Commission shall develop programs and plans for
official observance of the one hundred fiftieth anniversary of Nebraska statehood
in 2017. The commission shall work closely with various state agencies, boards,
commissions, and political subdivisions, including the State Department of
Education, the Department of Roads, the Nebraska State Historical Society,
the Nebraska State Fair Board, the Game and Parks Commission, and the Nebraska
Tourism Commission, to execute commemorative events and to implement educational
activities. The commission may also seek the guidance and support of any other
groups or organizations the commission deems necessary or helpful in fulfilling
its purpose.

The
commission may employ personnel, contract for services, and receive and expend
gifts, grants, and donations to aid in the performance of its duties. The
commission is empowered to expend any appropriations authorized by the Legislature
to carry out the purposes of sections 81-8,309 and 81-8,310.

Laws 2014, LB744, § 2.
July 1, 2014